Hawaii statutes.
§602-4 Superintendence of inferior courts.
The supreme court shall have the general superintendence of all courts of
inferior jurisdiction to prevent and correct errors and abuses therein where no
other remedy is expressly provided by law. [L 1892, c 57, §50; RL 1925, §2223;
RL 1935, §3592; RL 1945, §9603; RL 1955, §214-3; HRS §602-4; ree L 1979, c 111,
pt of §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

Through the Looking Glass--Finality, Interlocutory Appeals
and the Hawaii Supreme Court's Supervisory Powers. 9 UH L. Rev. 87 (1987).

The Application of the Collateral Order Doctrine to Criminal
Appeals in Hawai‘i. 19 UH L. Rev. 73 (1997).

Case Notes

Applied in disposing of appeal on points of law from an
illegal sentence. 13 H. 335 (1901).

Appeals in forma pauperis, powers of supreme court in
connection with. See 42 H. 1 (1957); 44 H. 31, 352 P.2d 616 (1959); 44 H. 52,
352 P.2d 629 (1959). But see 26 H. 469 (1922).

Circumstances supplied justification for exercise of court's
supervisory jurisdiction and court's power to issue prohibition. 59 H. 224,
580 P.2d 49 (1978).

Supervisory power under section invoked to provide needed
guidance on matter of grave public concern. 59 H. 224, 580 P.2d 49 (1978).

Supervisory jurisdiction invoked where submission to
warrantless searches apparently standard condition of probation. 67 H. 268,
686 P.2d 1379 (1984).

Supervisory jurisdiction invoked to declare judge personally
entering the jury room to answer the jurors' questions improper and
prejudicial. 69 H. 204, 738 P.2d 812 (1987).

Supreme court invoked supervisory jurisdiction over district
court judge. 71 H. 304, 788 P.2d 1281 (1990).

Exercise of supreme court's supervisory powers was not
appropriate in case where defendant was not without remedy expressly provided
by law; §641-11 and HRAP rule 4(b) provided defendant opportunity to appeal
from final judgment and HRPP rule 40 may have provided defendant opportunity to
contest validity of no-contest plea by post-conviction petition. 96 H. 462
(App.), 32 P.3d 106 (2001).

Mentioned: 79 H. 26, 897 P.2d 953 (1995).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next